arapahoverbs.lexc
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@heneebihcehi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^heneebihcehi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tees3i'oku@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tees3i'oku^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@teensine@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^teensine^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@teenoku@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^teenoku^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@teenon@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^teenon^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@teeno'on@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^teeno'on^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@teeno'wuun@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^teeno'wuun^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hookusine@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hookusine^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hookunoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hookunoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@wo'wo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^wo'wo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@wo'woku@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^wo'woku^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@biiin@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^biiin^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@neenenseikoohu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^neenenseikoohu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@too'ouhu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^too'ouhu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@too'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^too'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@too'ooneihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^too'ooneihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@too'owooneihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^too'owooneihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@woxu'oontoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^woxu'oontoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bobooteeneb@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bobooteeneb^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noko3tobee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noko3tobee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@boboo3itii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^boboo3itii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@boboo3itoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^boboo3itoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bobooteene'in@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bobooteene'in^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nokoo3oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nokoo3oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@notiitii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^notiitii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@notohei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^notohei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@howo3eesneesine@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^howo3eesneesine^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nokooyeih@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nokooyeih^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@woxoehi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^woxoehi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@touseyeih@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^touseyeih^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@xouuwoo3it@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^xouuwoo3it^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@beteenitii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^beteenitii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@howouun@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^howouun^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ho'wootee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ho'wootee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoyeisee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoyeisee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiinitoo3ib@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiinitoo3ib^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@huunsee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^huunsee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoh'onookei'iini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoh'onookei'iini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@he'iyootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^he'iyootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noo'oe'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noo'oe'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce'exohwoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce'exohwoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nookonoxuuh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nookonoxuuh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiheyeinooxu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiheyeinooxu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hookkuu3@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hookkuu3^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoo3tone'einouute@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoo3tone'einouute^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nookunoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nookunoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nee3oneihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nee3oneihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nee3oononeihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nee3oononeihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nee3ooxuwu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nee3ooxuwu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@heceseihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^heceseihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hece'eekuu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hece'eekuu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hecesesei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hecesesei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@howuu3ooh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^howuu3ooh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoxesiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoxesiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bexoxoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bexoxoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bexoxo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bexoxo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bexooxuseenoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bexooxuseenoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bexunoon@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bexunoon^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesistoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesistoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesoneihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesoneihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesistootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesistootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesoninoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesoninoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesoni3ecoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesoni3ecoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesoneihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesoneihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cesisoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cesisoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceeceseibitoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceeceseibitoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceecih'ei'i@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceecih'ei'i^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceeciheinooni@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceeciheinooni^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceecii3enoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceecii3enoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
